California statutes. Penal Code
(c) Any additional grand jury which is impaneled pursuant to this section may serve for a period of one year from the date of impanelment, but may be discharged at any time within the one-year period by order of the presiding judge or the judge appointed by the presiding judge to supervise the grand jury. In no event shall more than one additional grand jury be impaneled pursuant to this section at the same time.

(d) Whenever an additional grand jury is impaneled pursuant to this section, it may inquire into any matters which are subject to grand jury inquiry and shall have the sole and exclusive jurisdiction to return indictments, except for any matters which the regular grand jury is inquiring into at the time of its impanelment.

(e) It is the intent of the Legislature that all persons qualified for jury service shall have an equal opportunity to be considered for service as criminal grand jurors in the county in which they reside, and that they have an obligation to serve, when summoned for that purpose. All persons selected for the additional criminal grand jury shall be selected at random from a source or sources reasonably representative of a cross section of the population which is eligible for jury service in the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 25, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

904.7.

(a) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 904.6 or any other provision, in the County of San Bernardino, the presiding judge of the superior court, or the judge appointed by the presiding judge to supervise the grand jury, may, upon the request of the Attorney General or the district attorney or upon his or her own motion, order and direct the impanelment of an additional civil grand jury pursuant to this section.

(b) The presiding judge or the judge appointed by the presiding judge to supervise the grand jury shall select persons, at random, from the list of trial jurors in civil and criminal cases and shall examine them to determine if they are competent to serve as grand jurors. When a sufficient number of competent
 persons have been selected, they shall constitute an additional grand jury.

(c) Any additional civil grand jury that is impaneled pursuant to this section may serve for a term as determined by the presiding judge or the judge appointed by the presiding judge to supervise the civil grand jury, but may be discharged at any time within the set term by order of the presiding judge or the judge appointed by the presiding judge to supervise the civil grand jury. In no event shall more than one additional civil grand jury be impaneled pursuant to this section at the same time.

(d) Whenever an additional civil grand jury is impaneled pursuant to this section, it may inquire into matters of oversight, conduct investigations, issue reports, and make recommendations, except for any matters that the regular grand jury is inquiring into at the time of its impanelment. Any additional civil
 grand jury impaneled pursuant to this section shall not have jurisdiction to issue indictments.

(e) It is the intent of the Legislature that, in the County of San Bernardino, all persons qualified for jury service shall have an equal opportunity to be considered for service as grand jurors within the county, and that they have an obligation to serve, when summoned for that purpose. All persons selected for an additional grand jury shall be selected at random from a source or sources reasonably representative of a cross section of the population that is eligible for jury service in the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 304, Sec. 7.   (SB 428)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

904.8.

(a) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 904.6 or any other provision, in the County of Los Angeles, the presiding judge of the superior court, or the judge appointed by the presiding judge to supervise the grand jury, may, upon the request of the Attorney General or the district attorney or upon his or her own motion, order and direct the impanelment of up to two additional grand juries pursuant to this section.

(b) The presiding judge or the judge appointed by the presiding judge to supervise the grand jury shall select persons, at random, from the list of trial jurors in civil and criminal cases and shall examine them to determine if they are competent to serve as grand jurors. When a sufficient number of competent persons have been selected, they shall constitute an additional grand jury.

(c) Any additional grand juries that are impaneled pursuant to this section may serve for a period of one year from the date of impanelment, but may be discharged at any time within the one-year period by order of the presiding judge or the judge appointed by the presiding judge to supervise the grand jury. In no event shall more than two additional grand juries be impaneled pursuant to this section at the same time.

(d) Whenever additional grand juries are impaneled pursuant to this section, they may inquire into any matters that are subject to grand jury inquiry and shall have the sole and exclusive jurisdiction to return indictments, except for any matters that the regular grand jury is inquiring into at the time of its impanelment.

(e) It is the intent of the Legislature that, in the County of Los Angeles, all persons qualified for jury service shall have an equal opportunity to be considered for service as criminal grand jurors within the county, and that they have an obligation to serve, when summoned for that purpose. All persons selected for an additional criminal grand jury shall be selected at random from a source or sources reasonably representative of a cross section of the population that is eligible for jury service in the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 82, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

905.

In all counties there shall be at least one grand jury drawn and impaneled in each year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1408, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

905.5.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), the grand jury shall be impaneled and serve during the fiscal year of the county in the manner provided in this chapter.

(b) The board of supervisors of a county may provide that the grand jury shall be impaneled and serve during the calendar year. The board of supervisors shall provide for an appropriate transition from fiscal year term to calendar year term or from calendar year term to fiscal year term for the grand jury. The provisions of subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 901 shall not be deemed a limitation on any appropriate transition provisions as determined by resolution or ordinance; and, except as otherwise provided in this chapter, no transition grand jury shall serve more than 18 months.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 344, Sec. 1.   Effective July 10, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

906.

The order shall designate the time at which the drawing will take place. The names of the grand jurors shall be drawn, and the list of names certified and summoned, as is provided for drawing and summoning trial jurors. The names of any persons drawn, who are not impaneled upon the grand jury, may be again placed in the grand jury box.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 501.)
-------------------------------------------

907.

Any grand juror summoned, who willfully and without reasonable excuse fails to attend, may be attached and compelled to attend and the court may also impose a fine not exceeding fifty dollars ($50), upon which execution may issue. If the grand juror was not personally served, the fine shall not be imposed until upon an order to show cause an opportunity has been offered the grand juror to be heard.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 501.)
-------------------------------------------

908.

If the required number of the persons summoned as grand jurors are present and not excused, the required number shall constitute the grand jury. If more than the required number of persons are present, the jury commissioner shall write their names on separate ballots, which the jury commissioner shall fold so that the names cannot be seen, place them in a box, and draw out the required number of them. The persons whose names are on the ballots so drawn shall constitute the grand jury. If less than the required number of persons are present, the panel may be filled as provided in Section 211 of the Code of Civil Procedure. If more of the persons summoned to complete a grand jury attend than are required, the requisite number shall be obtained by writing the names of those summoned and not excused on ballots, depositing them in a box, and drawing as provided above.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 149, Sec. 73.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

908.1.

When, after the grand jury consisting of the required number of persons has been impaneled pursuant to law, the membership is reduced for any reason, vacancies within an existing grand jury may be filled, so as to maintain the full membership at the required number of persons, by the jury commissioner, in the presence of the court, drawing out sufficient names to fill the vacancies from the grand jury box, pursuant to law, or from a special venire as provided in Section 211 of the Code of Civil Procedure. A person selected as a grand juror to fill a vacancy pursuant to this section may not vote as a grand juror on any matter upon which evidence has been taken by the grand jury prior to the time of the person’s selection.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 149, Sec. 74.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

908.2.

(a) Upon the decision of the superior court pursuant to Section 901 to adopt this method of selecting grand jurors, when the required number of persons have been impaneled as the grand jury pursuant to law, the jury commissioner shall write the names of each person on separate ballots. The jury commissioner shall fold the ballots so that the names cannot be seen, place them in a box, and draw out half of the ballots, or in a county where the number of grand jurors is uneven, one more than half. The persons whose names are on the ballots so drawn shall serve for 12 months until July 1 of the following year. The persons whose names are not on the ballots so drawn shall serve for six months until January 1 of the following year.

(b) Each subsequent year, on January 2 and July 2, a sufficient number of grand jurors shall be impaneled to replace those whose service concluded the previous day. Those persons impaneled on January 2 shall serve until January 1 of the following year. Those persons impaneled on July 2 shall serve until July 1 of the following year. A person may not serve on the grand jury for more than one year.

(c) The provisions of subdivisions (a) and (b) do not apply to the selection of grand jurors for an additional grand jury authorized pursuant to Section 904.6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 149, Sec. 75.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

909.

Before accepting a person drawn as a grand juror, the court shall be satisfied that such person is duly qualified to act as such juror. When a person is drawn and found qualified he shall be accepted unless the court, on the application of the juror and before he is sworn, excuses him from such service for any of the reasons prescribed in this title or in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 190), Title 3, Part 1 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 501.)
-------------------------------------------

910.

No challenge shall be made or allowed to the panel from which the grand jury is drawn, nor to an individual grand juror, except when made by the court for want of qualification, as prescribed in Section 909.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 501.)
-------------------------------------------

911.

The following oath shall be taken by each member of the grand jury: “I do solemnly swear (affirm) that I will support the Constitution of the United States and of the State of California, and all laws made pursuant to and in conformity therewith, will diligently inquire into, and true presentment make, of all public offenses against the people of this state, committed or triable within this county, of which the grand jury shall have or can obtain legal evidence. Further, I will not disclose any evidence brought before the grand jury, nor anything which I or any other grand juror may say, nor the manner in which I or any other grand juror may have voted on any matter before the grand jury. I will keep the charge that will be given to me by the court.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 111, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

912.

From the persons summoned to serve as grand jurors and appearing, the court shall appoint a foreman. The court shall also appoint a foreman when the person already appointed is excused or discharged before the grand jury is dismissed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 501.)
-------------------------------------------

913.

If a grand jury is not in existence, the Attorney General may demand the impaneling of a grand jury by those charged with the duty to do so, and upon such demand by him, it shall be their duty to do so.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 501.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Powers and Duties of Grand Jury [914. - 939.91.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [914. - 924.6.]

914.

(a) When the grand jury is impaneled and sworn, it shall be charged by the court. In doing so, the court shall give the grand jurors such information as it deems proper, or as is required by law, as to their duties, and as to any charges for public offenses returned to the court or likely to come before the grand jury.

(b) To assist a grand jury in the performance of its statutory duties regarding civil matters, the court, in consultation with the district attorney, the county
 counsel, and at least one former grand juror, shall ensure that a grand jury that considers or takes action on civil matters receives training that addresses, at a minimum, report writing, interviews, and the scope of the grand jury’s responsibility and statutory authority.

(c) Any costs incurred by the court as a result of this section shall be absorbed by the court or the county from existing resources.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 443, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

914.1.

When a grand jury is impaneled, for purposes which include the investigation of, or inquiry into, county matters of civil concern, the judge of the superior court of the county, in addition to other matters requiring action, shall call its attention to the provisions of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 23000) of Division 1 of Title 3, and Sections 24054 and 26525 of the Government Code, and instruct it to ascertain by a careful and diligent investigation whether such provisions have been complied with, and to note the result of such investigation in its report. At such time the judge shall also inform and charge the grand jury especially as to its powers,
 duties, and responsibilities under Article 1 (commencing with Section 888) of Chapter 2, and Article 2 (commencing with Section 925), Article 3 (commencing with Section 934) of this chapter, Article 3 (commencing with Section 3060) of Chapter 7 of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, and Section 17006 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1297, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

914.5.

The grand jury shall not spend money or incur obligations in excess of the amount budgeted for its investigative activities pursuant to this chapter by the county board of supervisors unless the proposed expenditure is approved in advance by the presiding judge of the superior court after the board of supervisors has been advised of the request.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 740.)
-------------------------------------------

915.

When the grand jury has been impaneled, sworn, and charged, it shall retire to a private room, except when operating under a finding pursuant to Section 939.1, and inquire into the offenses and matters of civil concern cognizable by it. On the completion of the business before the grand jury or expiration of the term of prescribed service of one or more grand jurors, the court shall discharge it or the affected individual jurors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1297, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

916.

Each grand jury shall choose its officers, except the foreman, and shall determine its rules of proceeding. Adoption of its rules of procedure and all public actions of the grand jury, whether concerning criminal or civil matters unless otherwise prescribed in law, including adoption of final reports, shall be only with the concurrence of that number of grand jurors necessary to find an indictment pursuant to Section 940. Rules of procedure shall include guidelines for that grand jury to ensure that all findings included in its final reports are supported by documented evidence, including reports of contract auditors or consultants, official records, or
 interviews attended by no fewer than two grand jurors and that all problems identified in a final report are accompanied by suggested means for their resolution, including financial, when applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1297, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

916.1.

If the foreman of a grand jury is absent from any meeting or if he is disqualified to act, the grand jury may select a member of that body to act as foreman pro tempore, who shall perform the duties, and have all the powers, of the regularly appointed foreman in his absence or disqualification.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 501.)
-------------------------------------------

916.2.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a grand juror who is a current employee of, or a former or retired employee last employed within the prior three years by, an agency within the investigative jurisdiction of the civil grand jury shall inform the foreperson and court of that fact and shall recuse himself or herself from participating in any grand jury civil investigation of that agency,
 including any discussion or vote concerning a civil investigation of that agency.

(b) This section shall be in addition to any local policies or rules regarding conflict of interest for grand jurors.

(c) For purposes of this section, “agency” means a department or operational part of a government entity, such as a city, county, city and county, school district, or other local government body.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 867, Sec. 21.   (SB 1144)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

917.

(a) The grand jury may inquire into all public offenses committed or triable within the county and present them to the court by indictment.

(b) Except as provided in Section 918, the grand jury shall not inquire into an offense that involves a shooting or use of excessive force by a peace officer described in Section 830.1, subdivision (a) of Section 830.2, or Section 830.39, that led to the death of a person being detained or arrested by the peace officer pursuant to Section
 836.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 175, Sec. 1.   (SB 227)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

918.

If a member of a grand jury knows, or has reason to believe, that a public offense, triable within the county, has been committed, he may declare it to his fellow jurors, who may thereupon investigate it.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 895.)
-------------------------------------------

919.

(a) The grand jury may inquire into the case of every person imprisoned in the jail of the county on a criminal charge and not indicted.

(b) The grand jury shall inquire into the condition and management of the public prisons within the county.

(c) The grand jury shall inquire into the willful or corrupt misconduct in office of public officers of every description within the county. Except as provided in Section 918, this
 subdivision does not apply to misconduct that involves a shooting or use of excessive force by a peace officer described in Section 830.1, subdivision (a) of Section 830.2, or Section 830.39, that led to the death of a person being detained or arrested by the peace officer pursuant to Section 836.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 175, Sec. 2.   (SB 227)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

920.

The grand jury may investigate and inquire into all sales and transfers of land, and into the ownership of land, which, under the state laws, might or should escheat to the State of California. For this purpose, the grand jury may summon witnesses before it and examine them and the records. The grand jury shall direct that proper escheat proceedings be commenced when, in the opinion of the grand jury, the evidence justifies such proceedings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 895.)
-------------------------------------------

921.

The grand jury is entitled to free access, at all reasonable times, to the public prisons, and to the examination, without charge, of all public records within the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 501.)
-------------------------------------------

922.

The powers and duties of the grand jury in connection with proceedings for the removal of district, county, or city officers are prescribed in Article 3 (commencing with Section 3060), Chapter 7, Division 4, Title 1, of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 501.)
-------------------------------------------

923.

(a) Whenever the Attorney General considers that the public interest requires, he or she may, with or without the concurrence of the district attorney, direct the grand jury to convene for the investigation and consideration of those matters of a criminal nature that he or she desires to submit to it. He or she may take full charge of the presentation of the matters to the grand jury, issue subpoenas, prepare
 indictments, and do all other things incident thereto to the same extent as the district attorney may do.

(b) Whenever the Attorney General considers that the public interest requires, he or she may, with or without the concurrence of the district attorney, petition the court to impanel a special grand jury to investigate, consider, or issue indictments for any of the activities subject to fine, imprisonment, or asset forfeiture under Section 14107 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. He or she may take full charge of the presentation of the matters to the grand jury, issue subpoenas, prepare indictments, and do all other things incident thereto to the same extent as the district attorney may do. If the evidence presented to the grand jury shows the commission of an offense or offenses for which venue would be in a county other than the county where the grand jury is impaneled, the Attorney General, with or without the concurrence of the
 district attorney in the county with jurisdiction over the offense or offenses, may petition the court to impanel a special grand jury in that county. Notwithstanding any other law, upon request of the Attorney General, a grand jury convened by the Attorney General pursuant to this subdivision may submit confidential information obtained by that grand jury, including, but not limited to, documents and testimony, to a second grand jury that has been impaneled at the request of the Attorney General pursuant to this subdivision in any other county where venue for an offense or offenses shown by evidence presented to the first grand jury is proper. All confidentiality provisions governing information, testimony, and evidence presented to a grand jury shall be applicable, except as expressly permitted by this subdivision. The Attorney General shall inform the grand jury that transmits confidential information and the grand jury that receives confidential information of any exculpatory evidence, as required by
 Section 939.71. The grand jury that transmits information to another grand jury shall include the exculpatory evidence disclosed by the Attorney General in the transmission of the confidential information. The Attorney General shall inform both the grand jury transmitting the confidential information and the grand jury receiving that information of their duties under Section 939.7. A special grand jury convened pursuant to this subdivision shall be in addition to the other grand juries authorized by this section, this chapter, or Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 893). 

(c) Whenever the Attorney General considers that the public interest requires, he or she may, with or without the concurrence of the district attorney, impanel a special statewide grand jury to investigate, consider, or issue indictments in any matters in which there are two or more activities, in which fraud or theft is a material element, that have occurred in more than one
 county and were conducted either by a single defendant or multiple defendants acting in concert.

(1) This special statewide grand jury may be impaneled in the Counties of Fresno, Los Angeles, Sacramento, San Diego, or San Francisco, at the Attorney General’s discretion. When impaneling a special statewide grand jury pursuant to this subdivision, the Attorney General shall use an existing regularly impaneled criminal grand jury within the period of its regular impanelment to serve as the special statewide grand jury and make arrangements with the grand jury coordinator in the applicable county, or with the presiding judge or whoever is charged with scheduling the grand jury hearings, in order to ensure orderly coordination and use of the grand jurors’ time for both regular grand jury duties and special statewide grand jury duties. Whenever the Attorney General impanels a special statewide grand jury, the prosecuting attorney representing the
 Attorney General shall inform the special statewide grand jury at the outset of the case that the special statewide grand jury is acting as a special statewide grand jury with statewide jurisdiction.

(2) For special statewide grand juries impaneled pursuant to this subdivision, the Attorney General may issue subpoenas for documents and witnesses located anywhere in the state in order to obtain evidence to present to the special statewide grand jury. The special statewide grand jury may hear all evidence in the form of testimony or physical evidence presented to the special statewide grand jury, irrespective of the location of the witness or physical evidence prior to subpoena. The special statewide grand jury impaneled pursuant to this subdivision may indict a person or persons with charges for crimes that occurred in counties other than where the special statewide grand jury is impaneled. The indictment shall then be submitted to the court in
 any county in which any of the charges could otherwise have been properly brought. The court where the indictment is filed under this subdivision shall have proper jurisdiction over all counts in the indictment.

(3) Notwithstanding Section 944, an indictment found by a special statewide grand jury convened pursuant to this subdivision and endorsed as a true bill by the special statewide grand jury foreperson, may be presented to the court, as set forth in paragraph (2), solely by the Attorney General and within five court days of the endorsement of the indictment. For indictments presented to the court in this manner, the Attorney General shall also file with the court or court clerk, at the time of presenting the indictment, an affidavit signed by the special statewide grand jury foreperson attesting that all the jurors who voted on the indictment heard all of the evidence presented by the Attorney General, and that a proper number of jurors
 voted for the indictment pursuant to Section 940. The Attorney General’s office shall be responsible for prosecuting an indictment produced by the special statewide grand jury.

(4) If a defendant makes a timely and successful challenge to the Attorney General’s right to convene a special statewide grand jury by clearly demonstrating that the charges brought are not encompassed by this subdivision, the court shall dismiss the indictment without prejudice to the Attorney General, who may bring the same or other charges against the defendant at a later date by way of another special statewide grand jury, properly convened, or a regular grand jury, or by any other procedure available.

(5) The provisions of Section 939.71 shall apply to the special statewide grand jury.

(6) Unless otherwise set forth in this section, a
 law applying to a regular grand jury impaneled pursuant to Section 23 of Article I of the California Constitution shall apply to a special statewide grand jury unless the application of the law to a special statewide grand jury would substantially interfere with the execution of one or more of the provisions of this section. If there is substantial interference, the provision governing the special statewide grand jury will govern.

(d) Upon certification by the Attorney General, a statement of the costs directly related to the impanelment and activities of the grand jury pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c) from the presiding judge of the superior court where the grand jury was impaneled shall be submitted for state reimbursement of the costs to the county or courts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 568, Sec. 2.   (SB 1474)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

924.

Every grand juror who willfully discloses the fact of an information or indictment having been made for a felony, until the defendant has been arrested, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 501.)
-------------------------------------------

924.1.

(a) Every grand juror who, except when required by a court, willfully discloses any evidence adduced before the grand jury, or anything which he himself or any other member of the grand jury has said, or in what manner he or she or any other grand juror has voted on a matter before them, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) Every interpreter for the disabled appointed to assist a member of the grand jury pursuant to Section 939.11 who, except when required by a court, willfully discloses any evidence adduced before the grand jury, or anything which he or she or any member of
 the grand jury has said, or in what manner any grand juror has voted on a matter before them, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 357, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

924.2.

Each grand juror shall keep secret whatever he himself or any other grand juror has said, or in what manner he or any other grand juror has voted on a matter before them. Any court may require a grand juror to disclose the testimony of a witness examined before the grand jury, for the purpose of ascertaining whether it is consistent with that given by the witness before the court, or to disclose the testimony given before the grand jury by any person, upon a charge against such person for perjury in giving his testimony or upon trial therefor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 501.)
-------------------------------------------

924.3.

A grand juror cannot be questioned for anything he may say or any vote he may give in the grand jury relative to a matter legally pending before the jury, except for a perjury of which he may have been guilty in making an accusation or giving testimony to his fellow jurors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 501.)
-------------------------------------------

924.4.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 924.1 and 924.2, any grand jury or, if the grand jury is no longer impaneled, the presiding judge of the superior court, may pass on and provide the succeeding grand jury with any records, information, or evidence acquired by the grand jury during the course of any investigation conducted by it during its term of service, except any information or evidence that relates to a criminal investigation or that could form part or all of the basis for issuance of an indictment. Transcripts of testimony reported during any
 session of the grand jury shall be made available to the succeeding grand jury upon its request.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 536.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

924.6.

(a) If no indictment is returned, the court that impaneled the grand jury shall, upon application of either party, order disclosure of all or part of the testimony of a witness before the grand jury to a defendant and the prosecutor in connection with any pending or subsequent criminal proceeding before any court if the court finds following an in camera hearing, which shall include the court’s review of the grand jury’s testimony, that the testimony is relevant, and appears to be admissible.

(b) If a grand jury decides not to return an indictment in a grand jury inquiry into an offense that involves a shooting or use of excessive force by a peace officer
 described in Section 830.1, subdivision (a) of Section 830.2, or Section 830.39, that led to the death of a person being detained or arrested by the peace officer pursuant to Section 836, the court that impaneled the grand jury shall, upon application of the district attorney, a legal representative of the decedent, or a legal representative of the news media or public, and with notice to the district attorney and the affected witness involved, and an opportunity to be heard, order disclosure of all or part of the indictment proceeding
 transcript, excluding the grand jury’s private deliberations and voting, to the movant, unless the court expressly finds, following an in camera hearing, that there exists an overriding interest that outweighs the right of
 public access to the record, the overriding interest supports sealing the record, a substantial probability exists that the overriding interest will be prejudiced if the record is not sealed, the proposed sealing is narrowly tailored, and no less restrictive means exist to achieve the overriding interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 204, Sec. 1.   (AB 1024)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Investigation of County, City, and District Affairs [925. - 933.6.]

925.

The grand jury shall investigate and report on the operations, accounts, and records of the officers, departments, or functions of the county including those operations, accounts, and records of any special legislative district or other district in the county created pursuant to state law for which the officers of the county are serving in their ex officio capacity as officers of the districts. The investigations may be conducted on some selective basis each year, but the grand jury shall not duplicate any examination of financial statements which has been performed by or for the board of supervisors pursuant to Section 25250 of the Government Code; this provision shall not be construed to limit the power of the grand jury to investigate and report on the operations, accounts, and records of the officers, departments, or functions of the county. The grand jury may enter into a joint contract with the board of supervisors to employ the services of an expert as provided for in Section 926.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 107.)
-------------------------------------------

925a.

The grand jury may at any time examine the books and records of any incorporated city or joint powers agency located in the county. In addition to any other investigatory powers granted by this chapter, the grand jury may investigate and report upon the operations, accounts, and records of the officers, departments, functions, and the method or system of performing the duties of any such city or joint powers agency and make such recommendations as it may deem proper and fit.

The grand jury may investigate and report upon the needs of all joint powers agencies in the county, including the abolition or creation of agencies and the equipment for, or the method or system of performing the duties of, the several agencies. It shall cause a copy of any such report to be transmitted to the governing body of any affected agency.

As used in this section, “joint powers agency” means an agency described in Section 6506 of the Government Code whose jurisdiction encompasses all or part of a county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 590, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

926.

(a) If, in the judgment of the grand jury, the services of one or more experts are necessary for the purposes of Sections 925, 925a, 928, 933.1, and 933.5 or any of them, the grand jury may employ one or more experts, at an agreed compensation, to be first approved by the court. If, in the judgment of the grand jury, the services of assistants to such experts are required, the grand jury may employ such assistants, at a compensation to be agreed upon and approved by the court. Expenditures for the services of experts and assistants for the purposes of Section 933.5 shall not exceed the sum of thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) annually, unless such expenditures shall also be approved by the board of supervisors.

(b) When making an examination of the books, records, accounts, and documents maintained and processed by the county assessor, the grand jury, with the consent of the board of supervisors, may employ expert auditors or appraisers to assist in the examination. Auditors and appraisers, while performing pursuant to the directive of the grand jury, shall have access to all records and documents that may be inspected by the grand jury subject to the same limitations on public disclosure as apply to the grand jury.

(c) Any contract entered into by a grand jury pursuant to this section may include services to be performed after the discharge of the jury, but in no event may a jury contract for services to be performed later than six months after the end of the fiscal year during which the jury was impaneled.

(d) Any contract entered into by a grand jury pursuant to this section shall stipulate that the product of that contract shall be delivered on or before a time certain to the then-current grand jury of that county for such use as that jury finds appropriate to its adopted objectives.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1297, Sec. 4.5.)
-------------------------------------------

927.

A grand jury may, and when requested by the board of supervisors shall, investigate and report upon the needs for increase or decrease in salaries of the county-elected officials. A copy of such report shall be transmitted to the board of supervisors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 481.)
-------------------------------------------

928.

Every grand jury may investigate and report upon the needs of all county officers in the county, including the abolition or creation of offices and the equipment for, or the method or system of performing the duties of, the several offices. Such investigation and report shall be conducted selectively each year. The grand jury shall cause a copy of such report to be transmitted to each member of the board of supervisors of the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 800, Sec. 5.)